Utah statutes.
58-31b-301.   License or certification required -- Classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of nursing, except as specifically provided in Sections 58-1-307 and 58-31b-308.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license or certification in the classification of:

(a)  licensed practical nurse;

(b)  registered nurse;

(c)  advanced practice registered nurse intern;

(d)  advanced practice registered nurse;

(e)  advanced practice registered nurse - CRNA without prescriptive practice; and

(f)  medication aide certified.

(3)  An individual holding an advanced practice registered nurse license as of July 1, 1998, who cannot document the successful completion of advanced course work in patient assessment, diagnosis and treatment, and pharmacotherapeutics, may not prescribe and shall be issued an "APRN - without prescriptive practice" license.

(4)  The division shall grant an advanced practice registered nurse license to any licensed advanced practice registered nurse currently holding prescriptive authority under any predecessor act on July 1, 1998.

(5)  An individual holding a certified registered nurse anesthetist license as of July 1, 2007, shall be issued an "APRN - CRNA - without prescriptive practice" license.

